src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Pronouns
! ========


!Pointing to all the pronominal subgrops:
! *Personal 
! *Demonstrative 
! *Reflexive 
! *Reciprocal 
! *Interrogative 
! *Relative 
! *Indefinite 


! Personal pronoun
! -----------------

LEXICON persproncasesg
                    +Nom:å%>n      K-CONS ;
             +Use/NG+Nom+Long:å%>nnå    K-VOW ; !betont
    +Err/Orth+Use/NG+Nom+Long:å%>nna    K-VOW ; !betont

                    +Gen:u%>v      K-CONS ;
!             +Use/NG+Gen:u%>v      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
             +Use/NG+Gen+Long:u%>vva    K-VOW ; !!betont
                    +Acc:u%>v      K-CONS ;
             +Use/NG+Acc+Long:u%>vva    K-VOW ; !!betont
                    +Ill:u%>nji    K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ill:u%>nje    K-VOW ; !dial
           +Err/Orth+Ill:u%>jni    K-VOW ;
                    +Ine:u%>jna    K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>ne     K-VOW ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>jne    K-VOW ; !dial
                    +Ela:u%>jsta   K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>jste   K-VOW ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>sta    K-VOW ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>ste    K-VOW ; !dial
                    +Par:u%>nnut   K-CONS ;
                    +Com:u%>jna    K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Com:u%>jne    K-VOW ; !dial
                    +Abe:u%>v#dá   K-VOW ;
                    +Abe:u%>v#da   K-VOW ;
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tá   K-VOW ;
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dak  K-CONS ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagi K-VOW ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagá K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tagá K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dá    K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#da    K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dak   K-CONS ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dagi  K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#dagá  K-VOW ; !
            +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>#tagá  K-VOW ; !

LEXICON persproncasesgII
                    +Nom:å%>n      K-CONS ;
             +Use/NG+Nom+Long:å%>dnå    K-VOW  ; !betont
                    +Gen:u%>v      K-CONS ;
!            +Use/NG+Gen:u%>v      NAMÁK  ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
             +Use/NG+Gen+Long:u%>vva    K-VOW  ; !betont
                    +Acc:u%>v      K-CONS ;
             +Use/NG+Acc+Long:u%>vva    K-VOW  ; ! betont
                    +Ill:u%>nji    K-VOW  ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ill:u%>nje    K-VOW  ; !dial
           +Err/Orth+Ill:u%>jni    K-VOW  ;
                    +Ine:u%>jna    K-VOW  ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>ne     K-VOW  ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ine:u%>jne    K-VOW  ; !dial
                    +Ela:u%>jsta   K-VOW  ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>jste   K-VOW  ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>sta    K-VOW  ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ela:u%>ste    K-VOW  ; !dial
                    +Par:u%>nnut   K-CONS ;
                    +Com:u%>jna    K-VOW  ;
  +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Com:u%>jne    K-VOW  ; !dial
                    +Abe:u%>vdá    K-VOW  ;
                    +Abe:u%>vda    K-VOW  ;
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tá   K-VOW  ;
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dak  K-CONS ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagi K-VOW  ; !
             +Use/NG+Abe:u%>v#dagá K-VOW  ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>v#tagá K-VOW  ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:u%>vdaga  K-VOW  ; !


LEXICON persproncasedu
                   +Nom:åj%>        K-CONS ;
            +Use/NG+Nom+Long:ådja%>      K-VOW ; !betont
                   +Gen:unnu%>      K-VOW ;
!            +Use/NG+Gen:unnu%>      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
                   +Acc:unnu%>v     K-CONS ;
                   +Ill:unnu%>j     K-CONS ;
 +Use/NG+Use/-Spell+Ill:unnu%>jna   K-VOW ; !dial
                   +Ine:unnu%>n     K-CONS ;
                   +Ela:unnu%>s     K-CONS ;
                   +Com:unnu%>jn    K-CONS ;
                   +Abe:unnu%>#da   K-VOW ;
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dak  K-CONS ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dagi K-VOW ; !
            +Use/NG+Abe:unnu%>#dagá K-VOW ; !
           +Err/Orth+Abe:unnu%>#tagá K-VOW ; !

LEXICON persproncasepl
                +Nom:ij%>        K-CONS ;
                +Gen:ijá%>       K-VOW ;
!        +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>       NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
                +Acc:ijá%>v      K-CONS ;
                +Ill:idji%>j     K-CONS ;
                +Ine:ijá%>n      K-CONS ;
                +Ela:ijá%>s      K-CONS ;
                +Com:ijá%>jn     K-CONS ;
                +Abe:ijá%>#da    K-VOW ;
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dak   K-CONS ; !
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dagi  K-VOW ; !
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>#dagá  K-VOW ; !
       +Err/Orth+Abe:ijá%>#tagá  K-VOW ; !
 
         +Use/NG+Nom:idja%>      K-VOW ; !Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>j      K-CONS ;  !Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
      !  +Use/NG+Gen:ijá%>j      NAMÁK ; !why does it go here (see stems>adjec)? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Use/NG+Acc:ijá%>jt     K-CONS ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Ill:idji%>jda   K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
+Err/Orth+Use/NG+Ill:idji%>jde   K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Ill:ijá%>jda    K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Ine:ijá%>jn     K-CONS ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Ela:ijá%>js     K-CONS ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Com:ijá%>j      K-CONS ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
                +Abe:ijá%>j#da   K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dak  K-CONS ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dagi K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
         +Use/NG+Abe:ijá%>j#dagá K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?
        +Err/Orth+Abe:ijá%>j#tagá K-VOW ; !!Plural case ending below, used in context with undef amount of people?


!LEXICON datcas ! Used for personal pron "dat" the demonstrative dat goes to "demcas"
! +Sg3:0 datcassg ;
! +Pl3:0 datcaspl ;

! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON demcas
 +Sg:0 demcassg ;
 +Pl:0 demcaspl ;
 +Ess:nen    K-CONS ;

LEXICON demcassg 
              +Nom:t      K-CONS ;
       +Use/NG+Nom+Long:hta    K-VOW ; !betong
              +Gen:n      K-CONS ;
!       +Use/NG+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; !why here? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
              +Acc:v      K-CONS ;
       +Use/NG+Acc+Long:vva    K-VOW ; !betont
             +Ill:si      K-VOW ;
             +Ine:n0na    K-VOW ; ! was: nºn
       +Use/NG+Ine:nne    K-VOW ; !dial
              +Ela:ssta   K-VOW ;
              +Ela+Sh:s   K-VOW ;
       +Use/NG+Ela:sste   K-VOW ; !dial
!      +Use/NG+Ela:sstága K-VOW ; !Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"
              +Com:jna    K-VOW ;
              +Par:t      K-CONS ;
!             +Abe:n#da   K-VOW ; !dandá and duonda dosn't exist
              +Abe:bdá    K-VOW ;
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak  K-CONS ; !
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K-VOW ; !
       +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K-VOW ; !
      +Abe+Err/Orth:n#tagá K-VOW ; !
         +Gen+Attr:n      K-CONS ;
         +Ine+Attr:n      K-CONS ;
         +Ill+Attr:n      K-CONS ;
         +Ela+Attr:t      K-CONS ; ! 
!+Err/Infl+Ela+Attr:n      K-CONS ; ! This is ungrammatical, "dán goades" should be "dát goades" !Outcommented because it fuckes up gramcheck
!+Err/Infl+Gen+Attr:       K-VOW ; ! This is ungrammatical, "dá jage" should be "dán jage" !Outcommented because it fuckes up gramcheck

LEXICON demcaspl
        +Nom:   K-VOW ;
 +Use/NG+Nom+Long:ha K-VOW ; !betont
            :j  demcasplobl ;

LEXICON demcasplobl
         +Gen:        K-VOW ;
!  +Use/NG+Gen:        NAMÁK ; !why here? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Acc:t       K-CONS ;
    +Acc+Attr:t       K-CONS ;
         +Ill:da      K-VOW ;
    +Ill+Attr:da      K-VOW ;
         +Ine:n       K-CONS ;
    +Ine+Attr:n       K-CONS ;
         +Ela:s       K-CONS ;
    +Ela+Attr:s       K-CONS ;
  +Use/NG+Ela+Long:sta     K-VOW ; !dial
  +Use/NG+Ela+Long:ste K-VOW ; !dial dajste, dájste, duojste
! +Use/NG+Ela:stága   # ; !!Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"

         +Com:       K-VOW ;
    +Com+Attr:       K-VOW ;
  !      +Abe:#da     K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dak    K-CONS ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagi   K-VOW ; !
  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagá   K-VOW ; !
 +Err/Orth+Abe:#tagá   K-VOW ; !

!LEXICON datcassg 
!         +Nom:t      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Nom:hta    K ; !
!         +Gen:n      K ;
!!  +Use/NG+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
!         +Acc:v      K ;
!  +Use/NG+Acc:vva    K ; !betong
!         +Ill:si     K ;
!         +Ine:n0na   K ; ! was: nºn
!  +Use/NG+Ine:nne    K ; !dial
!         +Ela:ssta   K ;
!  +Use/NG+Ela:sste   K ; ! dial
!! +Use/NG+Ela:sstága K ; !Can't find this anywhere. Maybe this is really dástága/dastagá? in "dáhtakcas"
!         +Com:jna    K ;
!         +Ess:nen    K ;
!         +Par:t      K ;
!  !      +Abe:n#da   K ;
!         +Abe:bdá    K ;
!  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dak  K ; !
!  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; !
!  +Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; !
! +Abe+Err/Orth:n#tagá K ; !

!LEXICON datcaspl
! +Nom: K ;
! +Nom+Use/NG:ha K ; !
! :j datcasplobl ;

!LEXICON datcasplobl
!         +Gen:      K ;
!!  +Use/NG+Gen:      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
!         +Acc:t     K ;
!    +Acc+Attr:t     K ;
!         +Ill:da    K ;
!    +Ill+Attr:da    K ;
!         +Ine:n     K ;
!    +Ine+Attr:n     K ;
!         +Ela:s     K ;
!    +Ela+Attr:s     K ;
!  +Use/NG+Ela:sta   K ; !
!  +Use/NG+Ela:ste # ; !dial dajste, dájste, duojste
!         +Com:      K ;
!    +Com+Attr:      K ;
!  !      +Abe:#da   K ;
!  +Use/NG+Abe:#dak  K ; !
!  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagi K ; !
!  +Use/NG+Abe:#dagá K ; !
! +Err/Orth+Abe:#tagá K ; !

LEXICON dáhtakcas ! Grundstöm and Spiik
         !        +Sg+Nom:hta    K-VOW ; !
                   +Sg+Nom:hta   K-posneg  ;
                   +Sg+Gen:ŋ     ga-posneg ;
         +Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k+Use/NG:ŋgas  #         ; ! ?
         +Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k+Use/NG:ŋgas  #         ; ! ?
+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-k:ngas  #         ; ! ?
+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+Foc/Pos-k:ngas  #         ; ! ?

          +Sg+Acc:v     ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ill:si    ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ine:nná   ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Ela:stá   ga-posneg ;
          +Sg+Com:jna   K-posneg  ;
          +Sg+Par:t     ga-posneg ;
 
